Washington statutes.
RCW 18.64.257

Prescription of dialysis devices and legend drugs by dialysis programs.

(1) This chapter shall not prevent a medicare-approved dialysis center, a facility operating a medicare-approved home dialysis program, a manufacturer, or a wholesaler, from selling, delivering, possessing, or dispensing directly to its dialysis patients, if prescribed by a practitioner acting within the scope of the practitioner's practice, those dialysis devices and legend drugs, including commercially available dialysate, used by home dialysis patients, in case or full shelf lots, as determined by the commission.

(2) The commission shall adopt rules to implement this section.

[ 2022 c 23 s 1; 2013 c 19 s 20; 1987 c 41 s 1.]

NOTES:

Application of legend drug statutes to dialysis programs: RCW 69.41.032.